Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 31.01. Metro Reform Commission.

§ 33.2-3100.1.
Metro Reform Commission established; membership; duties.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Commission” means the Metro Reform Commission.“WMATA” means the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

There is hereby created the Metro Reform Commission. The Commission shall consist of four members appointed as follows: two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates and two members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. Members of the Commission may or may not be members of the General Assembly. Members shall be citizens of the Commonwealth, but shall not be required to reside in the area served by WMATA. Members shall serve without compensation, but shall be entitled to be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties pursuant to §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

.

The Commission shall advise and make recommendations to the Signatories of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Compact of 1966 on reforms to the National Capital Area Interest Arbitration Standards Act.

History.

2018, cc. 854, 856.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §§

33.2-214.4

,

33.2-286

, and

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-638

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective until 30 days after the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each enact legislation or take actions to provide dedicated funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA). The percentage of funding provided by the Commonwealth for its share of WMATA funding pursuant to this act beginning with the fiscal year that this act becomes effective, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be proportional to the amount of funding provided by the District of Columbia and Maryland relative to their respective share of WMATA funding in that fiscal year.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that the contingency occurred April 25, 2018,
and the effective date is therefore May 25, 2018.